North Carolina statutes. Chapter 156. Drainage.
Article 4. Rights and Liabilities in the Corporation.

§ 156-44.
Shares of stock annexed to land.

The ownership of the shares of stock is indissolubly annexed to the ownership of the pieces of land adjudged to be benefited by the improvement; and such shares, or a part thereof proportionate to the area of such land that may descend or be conveyed for any longer time than three years, shall, upon such descent or conveyance, descend and pass with the land, even although such shares be not mentioned in the deed of conveyance, and although their transfer be forbidden by such deed so that every owner of such land in possession, except a tenant for a term of years, not exceeding three, and every owner in reversion or remainder after a term not exceeding three years, shall, during his ownership, be entitled to all the rights and privileges and be subject to all the obligations and burdens of a corporator. Every attempted sale of shares otherwise than as annexed to the land shall be void.

History.

1868-9, c. 164, s. 8; Code, s. 1317; Rev., s. 4002; C.S., s. 5302.

§ 156-45.
Shareholders to pay assessments.

Every corporator shall be bound to obey the lawful bylaws of the company, and pay all dues lawfully assessed on him: Provided, he shall in no case pay more than his proportion of the expenses as fixed by this Subchapter; and such dues may be collected in the corporate name in any court having jurisdiction; and every assessment duly docketed in the county where the land to be affected lies shall be a lien on the lands of the debtor which are connected with the corporation from the date of such docketing.

History.

1868-9, c. 164, s. 9; Code, s. 1318; Rev., s. 4003; C.S., s. 5303.

Cross References.

As to collection of assessments out of other property of delinquent, see

G.S. 156-106

.

§ 156-46.
Payment of dues entitles to use of canal.

Every corporator paying his dues legally assessed without regard to the number of his shares, shall be entitled to the full and free use of the canal for drainage and navigation, and of the road for passage and transportation. Bylaws may be made to regulate these rights, but not so as to produce an inequality.

History.

1868-9, c. 164, s. 10; Code, s. 1319; Rev., s. 4004; C.S., s. 5304.

§ 156-47.
Rights of infant owners protected.

If any proprietor whose lands are adjudged to be benefited by a canal shall be an infant, no process shall be issued against him during his minority, or within 12 months thereafter, to enforce payments of any assessment, and he may, at any time within such 12 months, apply to have any order, judgment, or decree made against him set aside as to him. If the infant or his guardian shall, during his minority, and the 12 months next thereafter, pay the dues assessed on him, he shall have all the rights and privileges of corporator, to be exercised through his guardian. If the infant shall fail to pay, he shall not have any such rights, but if no action to set aside the judgment of the court creating the corporation shall have been brought by him as aforesaid, or upon the decision of such action against him, he shall be entitled to receive his proper share of stock and to possess all the rights and be bound by all the liabilities of a corporator, including a liability for assessments made during his minority, but not for interest on such, nor for any penalty for their prior nonpayment.

History.

1868-9, c. 164, s. 11; Code, s. 1320; Rev., s. 4005; C.S., s. 5305.

§ 156-48.
Compensation for damage to lands.

If any proprietor of lands shall be damaged by any improvement proposed, the commissioners shall so report, and he shall be entitled to be compensated as may be just by the proprietor whose lands are benefited in proportion to the benefit to them respectively; but in estimating such damages the benefit shall be deducted, and such proprietor shall be entitled to all the rights and privileges of a corporator as respects the use of the improvement, but shall not be entitled to a vote, or be bound for the assessment.

History.

1868-9, c. 164, s. 12; Code, s. 1321; Rev., s. 4006; C.S., s. 5306.

§ 156-49.
Dissolution of corporation.

If, from any cause, the canal or other improvement shall become or shall prove to be valueless, any corporator may apply as is provided in other cases of special proceedings, and the court may dissolve the corporation created in connection with it.

History.

1868-9, c. 164, s. 13; Code, s. 1322; Rev., s. 4007; C.S., s. 5307.

§ 156-50.
Laborer’s lien for work on canal.

Whenever work or repair shall be done on such canal and any of the parties owning lands liable to be assessed for such work or repairs shall fail or refuse to pay the amount assessed upon their land, then and in that event the laborers performing such work shall have a lien upon such land to the extent of the amount assessed against the same by the corporation, and such lien may be enforced in the same manner as provided by the laws of this State for the enforcement of laborers’ lien.

History.

1899, c. 600, s. 2; Rev., s. 4009; C.S., s. 5308.

§ 156-51.
Penalty for nonpayment of assessments.

Whenever any person whose lands have been adjudged liable to contribute to the maintenance or repair of such canal shall fail or refuse to pay the amount assessed against his land for such maintenance or repair for 30 days after such payment has been demanded by the company, then the company may give such person notice in writing of its intention to cut off his right of drainage into the canal, and if such person shall still neglect and refuse to pay such assessment for 30 days after such notice, then the company may proceed to so obstruct and dam up the ditches of such delinquent as will effectually prevent his draining in the canal.

History.

1899, c. 600, s. 3; Rev., s. 4010; C.S., s. 5309.

§ 156-52.
Corporation authorized to issue bonds.

The corporations organized under this Subchapter are authorized to issue bonds to such an amount and in such denomination as they may elect, payable at such times as may be provided, and to sell the same at not less than par, the proceeds of the sale of such bonds to be used for the payment of the costs of survey and construction and maintenance of the canal. The bonds shall constitute a lien upon the lands drained or improved by the canal as described in the reports of the commissioners.

History.

1908, c. 75, s. 1; C.S., s. 5310.

§ 156-53.
Payment of bonds enforced.

Upon default of the payment of the interest or principal of such bonds, the holders of the bonds of the corporations organized under this Subchapter shall have a right to enforce the lien created by

G.S. 156-52

by civil actions in the superior courts of the State.

History.

1908, c. 75, s. 2; C.S., s. 5311.